Hawaii statutes.
§89-3 Rights of employees. Employees
shall have the right of self-organization and the right to form, join, or
assist any employee organization for the purpose of bargaining collectively
through representatives of their own choosing on questions of wages, hours, and
other terms and conditions of employment, and to engage in lawful, concerted
activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or
protection, free from interference, restraint, or coercion. An employee shall
have the right to refrain from any or all of such activities, except for having
a payroll deduction equivalent to regular dues remitted to an exclusive
representative as provided in section 89-4. [L 1970, c 171, pt of §2; am L
1981, c 180, §3; am L 2000, c 253, §94; am L 2005, c 245, §§4, 8; am L 2007, c
294, §2; am L Sp 2008, c 5, §1; am L 2010, c 106, §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Unilateral wage increases by employer pending representation
elections as constituting interference, restraint, or coercion. Att. Gen. Op.
74-6.

Case Notes

Strike found unlawful and therefore not a protected activity
under this section. 60 H. 361, 590 P.2d 993.

Where plaintiffs failed to demonstrate that bargaining over
pay dates was one of the core subjects of collective bargaining that triggers a
violation of article XIII, §2 of the Hawaii constitution, and failed to provide
the supreme court with their collective bargaining agreement to support their
contention that pay dates are bargainable, and these pay dates were not specifically
incorporated into their contract, the Act 355, L 1997 amendment to §78-13 to
unilaterally alter the "traditional practice" of being paid on the
fifteenth day and last day of the month did not violate their right to
collectively bargain pay periods. 111 H. 168, 140 P.3d 401.

As §84-13 prohibited the posting of campaign materials on a
union bulletin board on the fourth floor of a state building, and nothing in
chapter 89 was explicitly contrary to, or inconsistent with, that construction,
there was no conflict between §84-13 and this section. 116 H. 73, 170 P.3d 324.

Where the posting of campaign materials on a union bulletin
board on the fourth floor of a state building was prohibited by §84-13, and was
thus not lawful, the postings were not protected under the express language of
this section (2006). 116 H. 73, 170 P.3d 324.

Where the State, as employer, expressed a
"legitimate" concern with campaign materials postings on the union
bulletin board on the fourth floor of the department of transportation
building, inasmuch as the supervisors at the department believed them to be in
violation of §84-13 and an ethics commission bulletin entitled "Campaign
Restrictions for State Officials and State Employees", and there was no
Hawaii labor relations board finding of "union animus", the removal
of campaign materials from the union bulletin board did not infringe on the
"mutual aid or protection" clause of this section (2006). 116 H. 73,
170 P.3d 324.

The Hawaii labor relations board had jurisdiction to declare
whether the factual circumstances presented to it in the union's amended
petition would constitute a prohibited practice, where the amended petition
sought a declaratory ruling that the employers' service of subpoenas duces
tecum interfered with, restrained, and otherwise violated the employees' rights
under this section, and therefore constituted prohibited practices pursuant to
§89-13(a)(1). 131 H. 142 (App.), 315 P.3d 768 (2013).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next